Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 37-15-101.
Short title; sunset.

This chapter shall be known as the “Wyoming Telecommunications Act.”

This chapter is repealed effective July 1, 2023.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

37-14-101

; 2007, ch. 142, § 1; 2015 ch. 96, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 7, § 1, effective February 13, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (b) and redesignated the existing provisions as (a); and in (a) deleted “of 1995” from the end of the sentence.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b), substituted “July 1, 2019” for “July 1, 2015.”

The 2019 amendment,

in (b), substituted "2023" for "2019".

Laws 2019, ch. 7, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 13, 2019.

Cited

in

Tri County Tel. Ass'n v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 11 P.3d 938,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Wyo. 2000); US West Communs. v. Wyoming PSC, 15 P.3d 722,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 37-15-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 142, §
2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1, pertained to the legislative intent to ensure essential telecommunications services to the citizens of this state.

Laws 2007, ch. 142, § 3 makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

§ 37-15-103.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Affiliated telecommunications companies” means telecommunications companies:

In which five percent (5%) or more of the voting stock is controlled or owned, directly or indirectly, by a common principal; or

Whose management and policies are found by the commission, after notice and opportunity for hearing, to be controlled by a common principal.

“Commission” means the public service commission of Wyoming;

“Competitive telecommunications services” means those services found by the legislature or the commission to be competitive in accordance with W.S.

37-15-202

;

“Essential telecommunications service” means a customer’s access to service that is necessary for the origination or termination, or both, of two-way, switched telecommunications for both residential and business service within a local exchange area. Essential telecommunications services are limited to:

Access to interexchange services provided by interexchange telecommunications companies;

Single line flat-rate or single line measured residence or business voice service;

Transmission service and facilities necessary for the connection between the end user’s or customer’s premises and local network switching facility including the necessary signaling service used by customers to access essential telecommunications services;

Services necessary to connect 911 emergency services to the local network;

Switched access, which for the purposes of this chapter shall mean the switching and transport necessary to connect an interexchange telecommunications company with the local exchange central office for the purpose of originating or terminating, or both, the interexchange telecommunications company’s switched telecommunications service.

“Interexchange telecommunications company” means a person providing telecommunications service to connect end users located in different local exchange areas, but excluding companies which also provide noncompetitive local exchange services;

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 142, § 2.

“Local exchange area” means a geographic territorial unit established by the commission for providing telecommunications services;

“Local exchange service” means the provision of essential telecommunications service within a local exchange area;

“Noncompetitive telecommunications services” means those services which have not been found by the legislature or the commission to be competitive in accordance with W.S.

37-15-202

;

“Price” means any rate or charge set and published in accordance with this chapter and collected by the telecommunications company for any telecommunications service offered by it to the public or other telecommunications companies;

“Telecommunications company” means a person engaged in the furnishing of telecommunications service within this state;

“Telecommunications service” means the offering or transmitting for hire of telecommunications by means of telecommunications facilities using wire, radio, lightwave or other means;

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 96, § 2.

“Universal service” means the general availability of essential telecommunications service at an affordable and reasonable price;

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 96, § 2.

“Supported services” means the services or functionalities which shall be supported by the state universal service fund pursuant to W.S.

37-15-502

, as described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph:

The services designated for support are:

Voice grade access to the public switched network. “Voice grade access” is defined as a functionality that enables a user of telecommunications services to transmit voice communications, including signaling the network that the caller wishes to place a call, and to receive voice communications, including receiving a signal indicating there is an incoming call;

Local usage. “Local usage” means an amount of minutes of use of exchange service, prescribed by the commission, provided free of charge to end users;

Dual tone multi-frequency signaling or its functional equivalent. “Dual tone multi-frequency” is a method of signaling that facilitates the transportation of signaling through the network, shortening call set-up time;

Single-party service or its functional equivalent. “Single-party service” is telecommunications service that permits users to have exclusive use of a wireline subscriber loop or access line for each call placed, or, in the case of wireless telecommunications carriers, which use spectrum shared among users to provide service, a dedicated message path for the length of a user’s particular transmission;

Access to emergency services. “Access to emergency services” includes access to services, such as 911 and enhanced 911, provided by local governments or other public safety organizations. 911 is defined as a service that permits a telecommunications user, by dialing the three-digit code “911,” to call emergency services through a public safety answering point operated by the local government. “Enhanced 911” is defined as 911 service that includes the ability to provide automatic numbering information, which enables the public safety answering point to call back if the call is disconnected, and automatic location information, which permits emergency service providers to identify the geographic location of the calling party. “Access to emergency services” includes access to 911 and enhanced 911 services in accordance with applicable governing authority;

Access to operator services. “Access to operator services” is defined as access to any automatic or live assistance to a consumer to arrange for billing or completion, or both, of a telephone call;

Access to interexchange service. “Access to interexchange service” is defined as the use of the loop, as well as that portion of the switch that is paid for by the end user, or the functional equivalent of these network elements in the case of a wireless carrier, necessary to access an interexchange carrier’s network;

Access to directory assistance. “Access to directory assistance” is defined as access to a service that includes, but is not limited to, making available to customers, upon request, information contained in directory listings; and

Toll limitation for qualifying low-income consumers.

The commission may grant a company additional time to complete the network upgrades needed to provide single-party service, access to enhanced 911 service, or toll limitation. If such petition is granted, the otherwise eligible company will be permitted to receive universal service support for the duration of the period designated by the commission. The commission shall grant such a request only upon a finding that exceptional circumstances prevent an otherwise eligible company from providing single-party service, access to enhanced 911 service or toll limitation. The period should extend only as long as the commission finds that exceptional circumstances exist and shall not extend beyond the time that the commission deems necessary for that company to complete network upgrades. An otherwise eligible company that is incapable of offering one (1) or more of these three (3) specific supported services must demonstrate to the commission that exceptional circumstances exist with respect to each service for which the carrier desires a grant of additional time to complete network upgrades.

“Landline carrier” means a telecommunications company providing local exchange service, or its functional equivalent, to retail end users by means primarily of its own fiber, copper, electric lines or coaxial cable facilities.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 142, § 2.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

37-14-103

; Laws 2001, ch. 178, § 2; 2007, ch. 142, §§ 1, 2; 2015 ch. 96, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), inserted “voice” near the end of (iv)(B), deleted “or location” following “premises” and deleted “the” preceding “local” in (iv)(C), twice substituted “safety answering point” for “service access point” in (xvi)(A)(V), added (xvii), and repealed former (vi) which defined “local access transport area”; and repealed former (b), which read: “In determining the number of access lines of a telecommunications company for purposes of this chapter, the number of access lines of all affiliated telecommunications companies shall be aggregated in this state.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(xvi)(A)(I), deleted the former last sentence, which read: “For the purposes of this subparagraph, bandwidth for voice grade access shall be, at a minimum, three hundred (300) to three thousand (3,000) Hertz”; and deleted former (a)(xiii) and
(a)(xv), which defined “Total service long-run incremental cost” and “Universal service,” respectively.

“Essential telecommunications service.” —

With traditional telephone service still available throughout the state, ISDN, an enhanced digital service, was not “necessary” within the meaning of the statute because it was not required for origination or termination of two-way, switched telecommunications; ISDN was therefore a competitive telecommunications service and was not subject to price regulation by public service commission. US West Communs., Inc. v. Wyoming PSC, 989 P.2d 616,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1999).

Non-essential telecommunications service not subject to regulation. —

Optional business service allowing a customer using a number of telephone lines to include the lines in a single-switched system at volume discount rates, which was not necessary for the connection between the end user's premises and the local network switching facility, was not an essential telecommunications service under this section, and thus it was not subject to regulation as a noncompetitive service. U S West Communs. v. Wyoming PSC, 988 P.2d 1061,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 1999), modified, 15 P.3d 722,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 2000).

An optional business service which allowed a customer using a number of telephone lines to include the lines in a single-switched system was not an essential service as defined by statute and, therefore, was not subject to regulation as a noncompetitive service U S West Communs. v. PSC, 15 P.3d 722,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 37-15-104.
Services not regulated by this title.

Except for contributions to the universal service fund required pursuant to W.S.

37-15-501

and the assessment levied pursuant to W.S.

37-2-106

through

37-2-109

, telecommunications service does not include, and the provisions of this title do not apply to:

One-way transmission of radio or television signals for broadcast purposes, including the one-way transmission of video programming by a cable television or other system as well as subscriber interaction which is required for the selection of video programming;

Home and business and coinless, or coin operated public or semipublic telephone terminal equipment, and the use, location and charges for the use of such equipment;

Any billing and collection services;

Any inside wire and premise cable installation and maintenance;

Directory services, except as provided in W.S.

37-12-130

;

Telecommunications services using radio spectrum, cellular, or other wireless technology except as set forth in subparagraphs (A), (B) and (C) of this paragraph:

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 96, § 2.

To the extent permitted in accordance with the requirements set forth in federal law, consideration and determination of an application for designation as a federal eligible telecommunications carrier;

Determinations of eligibility for and amount of distribution of state universal service funds by the commission for supported services in accordance with W.S.

37-15-502

.

Video dial tone and multimedia services;

Private telecommunications networks, which for the purposes of this act shall mean a system for the provision of telecommunications service by a person or entity for the sole and exclusive use of the person or entity and not for resale directly or indirectly;

Nonvoice data services not operated by a company providing local exchange service;

Networks established by a person other than the local exchange company providing essential telecommunications services within the local exchange area to provide access to interexchange carrier services;

Except as provided in this paragraph, direct inward dial services and other services needed by answering services and paging services. To the extent not preempted by federal law or regulation the commission shall regulate direct inward dial services and other services needed by answering services and paging services as noncompetitive services in any local exchange area until there are at least two (2) telecommunications companies effectively offering direct inward dial and other needed services to the answering services and paging services serving that local exchange area;

Remote meter reading; and

Any other telecommunications service that is not regulated by this title.

In addition to subsection (a) of this section, telecommunications service does not include, and the provisions of this title do not apply to telecommunications services provided by the department of enterprise technology to private health care providers under W.S. 9-2-2906(j).

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 37-14-104; Laws 1997, ch. 110, § 1; 2001, ch. 178, § 2; ch. 186, § 1; 2007, ch. 142, § 1; 2012, ch. 30, § 3; 2015 ch. 96, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(ii) substituted “Home” for “Except as provided in this paragraph, home” and deleted the last sentence.

The 2012 amendment,

in (b), substituted “enterprise technology” for “administration and information,” and substituted “W.S. 9-2-2506(j)” for “W.S.

9-2-1026

.1(d).”

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, repealed former (a)(vi)(A), which read: “The quality of cellular service to the extent not preempted by federal law.”

§ 37-15-105.
VoIP and internet protocol enabled services.

As used in this section:

“Internet protocol enabled service” or “IP enabled service” means any service, capability, functionality or application, other than “voice over internet protocol service,” (VoIP) using existing internet protocol, or any successor internet protocol, that enables an end user to send or receive a communication in existing internet protocol format, or any successor internet protocol format, utilizing a broadband connection at the end user’s location, regardless of whether the communication is voice, data or video;

“Voice over internet protocol service” means any service that:

Enables real time, two-way voice communication originating from or terminating at the user’s location in internet protocol or a successor protocol;

Utilizes a broadband connection at the user’s location; and

Permits a user to receive a call that originates on the public switched telephone network and to terminate a call to the public switched telephone network.

The commission shall not regulate IP enabled service or voice over internet protocol service. Nothing in this section affects or modifies:

Any applicable wholesale tariff or any commission authority to implement or enforce any rights, duties or obligations of any party related to wholesale services;

Any entity’s obligations or rights or commission authority under sections 251 and 252 of the Federal Communications Act of 1934, 47 U.S.C. §§ 251 and 252;

Any commission jurisdiction over intrastate switched access rates, terms and conditions, including the implementation of federal law with respect to intercarrier compensation;

Any obligation for the provision of video or cable service by any entity under applicable law;

Any commission jurisdiction or authority pursuant to W.S. 37-15-401(a)(vii), including but not limited to commission jurisdiction or authority to address federal high cost fund or federal universal service fund issues;

Any obligation to offer essential telecommunications service as regulated by the commission in other sections of this chapter.

If a service provider voluntarily chooses to receive Wyoming universal service funds to support voice over internet protocol service that otherwise qualifies for support pursuant to W.S.

37-15-501

or

37-15-502

, then that supported voice over internet protocol service shall be subject to all laws and rules governing the receipt of such funds, and the support provided to those services shall not exceed the support that would be provided to eligible noncompetitive essential local exchange services on a per-access-line basis.

Voice over internet protocol service shall be subject to the following:

Any required assessments under W.S.

37-15-501

and

37-15-502

;

Any required assessment of 911 or E911 emergency service taxes under W.S.

16-9-101

through

16-9-105

;

Any required special fee under W.S.

16-9-209

; or

Any required assessment levied under W.S.

37-2-106

through

37-2-109

.

History.

2013 ch. 92, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 92, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.